Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 1. Prohibited Practices Generally.
§ 4.1-315.
Possession without license to sell alcoholic beverages upon premises of restaurant; exceptions; penalty.

No alcoholic beverages shall be kept or allowed to be kept upon any premises or upon the person of any proprietor or person employed upon the premises of a restaurant or other place where food or refreshments of any kind are furnished for compensation, except such alcoholic beverages as such person owning or operating such place of business is licensed to purchase and to sell at such place of business.

This section shall not apply to (i) any residence; (ii) alcoholic beverages in the possession of a passenger being transported for compensation as provided in subsection D of §

4.1-308

; (iii) dining areas in restaurants licensed by the Board while such areas are in use for private meetings or parties limited in attendance to members and guests of a particular group, association or organization; (iv) licensed restaurants in office buildings, industrial or similar facilities while such restaurant is closed to the public and is in use for private meetings or parties limited in attendance to employees and nonpaying guests of the owner or a lessee of all or part of such building or facility; or (v) any dining areas or private rooms of residents in an assisted living facility as defined in §

63.2-100

and licensed in accordance with Article 1 (§

63.2-1800

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 63.2.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, p. 876, § 4-61; 1954, c. 512; 1958, c. 270; 1968, c. 7; 1972, c. 168; 1974, c. 497; 1990, c. 932; 1993, c. 866; 2010, c. 114.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 114 added clause (v) of subsection B and made related changes.

§ 4.1-316.
Keeping or drinking alcoholic beverages upon premises of club; penalty.

No person operating a club for profit or otherwise, either public or private, shall (i) keep or allow to be kept any alcoholic beverages, either by himself or any other person, upon the premises or (ii) permit the drinking of any alcoholic beverages upon the premises, unless he is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-61.1; 1954, c. 147; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-317.
Maintaining common nuisances; penalties.

All houses, boathouses, buildings, club or fraternity or lodge rooms, boats, cars and places of every description where alcoholic beverages are manufactured, stored, sold, dispensed, given away or used contrary to law, by any scheme or device whatever, shall be deemed common nuisances.No person shall maintain, aid, abet or knowingly associate with others in maintaining a common nuisance.Any person convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

In addition, after due notice and opportunity to be heard on the part of any owner or lessor not involved in the original offense, by a proceeding analogous to that provided in §§

4.1-339

through

4.1-348

and upon proof of guilty knowledge, judgment may be given that such house, building, boathouse, car or other place, or any room or part thereof, be closed. The court may, upon the owner or lessor giving bond in the penalty of not less than $500 and with security to be approved by the court, conditioned that the premises shall not be used for unlawful purposes, or in violation of the provisions of this chapter for a period of five years, turn the same over to its owner or lessor; or proceeding may be had in equity as provided in §

4.1-335

.

In a proceeding under this section, judgment shall not be entered against the owner, lessor, or lienholder of the property unless it is proved he (i) knew of the unlawful use of the property and (ii) had the right, because of such unlawful use, to enter and repossess the property.

History.

Code 1950, p. 877, § 4-81; 1954, c. 484; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

For general statutes relating to public or common nuisances, see §§

48-1

through

48-6

.

§ 4.1-318.
Violations by armed person; penalty.

No person shall unlawfully manufacture, transport or sell any alcoholic beverages, and at the time of the unlawful manufacturing, transporting, or selling or aiding or assisting in any manner in such act, shall carry on or about his person, or have on or in any vehicle which he may be using to aid him in any such purpose, or have in his possession, actual or constructive, at or within 100 yards of any place where any such alcoholic beverages are being unlawfully manufactured, transported or sold, any dangerous weapon as described in §

18.2-308

.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-83; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 4.1-319.
Disobeying subpoena; hindering conduct of hearing; penalty.

No person shall (i) fail or refuse to obey any subpoena issued by the Board, any Board member, or agent authorized by the Board to issue such subpoena or (ii) hinder the orderly conduct and decorum of any hearing held and conducted by the Board, any Board member, or agent authorized by the Board to hold and conduct such hearing.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-70; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-320.
Illegal advertising; penalty; exception.

Except in accordance with this subtitle and Board regulations, no person shall advertise in or send any advertising matter into the Commonwealth about or concerning alcoholic beverages other than those which may legally be manufactured or sold without a license.

Manufacturers, wholesalers, and retailers may engage in the display of outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising on lawfully erected signs provided such display is done in accordance with §

4.1-112.2

and Board regulations.

Except as provided in subsection D, any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

For violations of §

4.1-112.2

relating to distance and zoning restrictions on outdoor advertising, the Board shall give the advertiser written notice to take corrective action to either bring the advertisement into compliance with this subtitle and Board regulations or to remove such advertisement. If corrective action is not taken within 30 days, the advertiser shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

Neither this section nor any Board regulation shall prohibit (i) the awarding of watches of a wholesale value of less than $100 by a licensed distillery, winery or brewery, to participants in athletic contests; (ii) the exhibition or display of automobiles, boats, or aircraft regularly and normally used in racing or other competitive events and the sponsorship of an automobile, boat or aircraft racing team by a licensed distillery, winery or brewery and the display on the automobile, boat or aircraft and uniforms of the members of the racing team, the trademark or brand name of an alcoholic beverage manufactured by such distillery, winery or brewery; (iii) the sponsorship of a professional athletic event, including, but not limited to, golf, auto racing or tennis, by a licensed distillery, winery or brewery or the use of any trademark or brand name of any alcoholic beverage in connection with such sponsorship; (iv) the advertisement of beer by the display of such product’s name on any airship, which advertising is paid for by the manufacturer of such product; (v) the advertisement of beer or any alcoholic beverage by the display of such product’s name on any scale model, reproduction or replica of any motor vehicle, aircraft or watercraft offered for sale; (vi) the placement of billboard advertising within stadia, coliseums, or racetracks that are used primarily for professional or semiprofessional athletic or sporting events; or (vii) the sponsorship of an entertainment or cultural event.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-69; 1978, c. 630; 1979, c. 196; 1980, c. 407; 1993, c. 866; 1995, c. 222; 2009, c. 322; 2011, c. 728; 2012, cc. 760, 818.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 728, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of subsections B through E of §

4.1-320

of this act shall expire on January 1, 2013.” Acts 2012, cc. 760 and 818, effective April 18, 2012, amended this section by deleting former subsections B through E. Therefore current subsections B through E will not expire.

Acts 2011, c. 728, cl. 4 provides: “That the expiration of certain provisions of §

4.1-320

in accordance with the third enactment of this act shall not invalidate any regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 322 added clause (vi) to the third paragraph and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 728, effective March 23, 2011, added subsections B through E and the subsection A, F, and G designators. See Editor’s note for expiration for subsections B through E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 760 and 818, effective April 18, 2012, are identical and inserted “this title and” in subsection A; deleted former subsection B, C, D, E, regarding signs and advertising; added new subsection B and substituted current subsection C for former F, which read: “Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.”; added subsection D; and redesignated former subsection G as subsection E.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Brand name.” —

Title 4.1 does not define “brand name,” nor has the Board defined this term in its regulations. In the context of wine labels, Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority appears to be using the term “brand name” synonymously with the term “brand,” as that term is defined by the Virginia Code. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Richard L. Saslaw, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-061, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (11/15/19).

Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority guidance documents should not deem every change on a label to constitute a new brand in a manner that is contrary to the statutory definition of “brand” or that is contrary to regulations promulgated by the ABC Board. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Richard L. Saslaw, Member, Senate of Virginia, 18-061, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 32 (11/15/19).

§ 4.1-321.
Delivery of alcoholic beverages to prisoners in jail prohibited; penalty.

No person shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to any prisoner in any local correctional facility, any alcoholic beverage.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-93; 1993, c. 866.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 4.1-322.
Possession or consumption of alcoholic beverages by interdicted persons; penalty.

No person who has been interdicted pursuant to §

4.1-333

or §

4.1-334

shall possess any alcoholic beverages, except those acquired in accordance with subdivisions 1 through 5 of §

4.1-200

, nor be drunk in public in violation of §

18.2-388

.

Any interdicted person found to be in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-52; 1954, c. 484; 1982, c. 66; 1993, c. 866; 1996, c. 717.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Law Review.

For note, “Is Powell Still Valid? The Supreme Court’s Changing Stance on Cruel and Unusual Punishment,” see 104 Va. L. Rev. 547 (2018).

§ 4.1-323.
Attempts; aiding or abetting; penalty.

No person shall attempt to do any of the things prohibited by this subtitle or to aid or abet another in doing, or attempting to do, any of the things prohibited by this subtitle.

On an indictment, information or warrant for the violation of this subtitle, the jury or the court may find the defendant guilty of an attempt, or being an accessory, and the punishment shall be the same as if the defendant were solely guilty of such violation.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-87; 1993, c. 866.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Accomplices and Accessories, § 8; 2C M.J. Autrefois, Acquit and Convict, § 7; 3A M.J. Bigamy, §§ 2, 3.10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 48.